Utah statutes.
61-1-18.5.   Securities Commission -- Transition.
(1) (a)  There is created a Securities Commission.
(b)  The division shall provide staffing to the commission.
(2) (a)  The commission shall:
(i)  formulate and make recommendations to the director regarding policy and
budgetary matters;
(ii)  submit recommendations regarding registration requirements;
(iii)  formulate and make recommendations to the director regarding the
establishment of reasonable fees;
(iv)  act in an advisory capacity to the director with respect to the exercise
of the director's duties, powers, and responsibilities;
(v)  conduct an administrative hearing under this chapter that is not:
(A)  delegated by the commission to an administrative law judge or the
division relating to a violation of this chapter; or
(B)  expressly delegated to the division under this chapter;
(vi)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), impose a sanction as provided
in this chapter;
(vii)  review rules made by the division for purposes of concurrence in
accordance with Section 61-1-24; and
(viii)  perform other duties as this chapter provides.
(b) (i)  The commission may delegate to the division the authority to impose a
sanction under this chapter.
(ii)  If under Subsection (2)(b)(i) the commission delegates to the division
the authority to impose a sanction, a person who is subject to the sanction
may petition the commission for review of the sanction.
(iii)  A person who is sanctioned by the division in accordance with this
Subsection (2)(b) may seek agency review by the executive director only after
the commission reviews the division's action.
(3) (a)  The governor shall appoint five members to the commission with the
consent of the Senate as follows:
(i)  two members from the securities brokerage community:
(A)  who are not from the same broker-dealer or affiliate; and
(B)  who have at least five years prior experience in securities matters;
(ii)  one member from the securities section of the Utah State Bar:
(A)  whose practice primarily involves:
(I)  corporate securities; or
(II)  representation of plaintiffs in securities cases;
(B)  who does not routinely represent clients involved in:
(I)  civil or administrative litigation with the division; or
(II)  criminal cases brought under this chapter; and
(C)  who has at least five years prior experience in securities matters;
(iii)  one member who is an officer or director of a business entity not
subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934; and
(iv)  one member from the public at large who has no active participation in
the securities business.
(b)  A member may not serve more than two consecutive terms.
(4) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(b) and subject to Subsection
(4)(c), as terms of current members expire, the governor shall appoint a new
member or reappointed member to a four-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), the governor shall, at the time of
appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the
terms of commission members are staggered so that approximately half of the
commission is appointed every two years.
(c)  For purposes of making an appointment to the commission, the governor:
(i)  shall as of May 12, 2009:
(A)  appoint all five members of the commission; and
(B)  stagger the terms of the five members of the commission to comply with
Subsection (4)(b); and
(ii)  may not consider the commission an extension of the previous Securities
Advisory Board.
(d)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the governor
shall appoint a replacement member for the unexpired term.
(e)  A member shall serve until the member's respective successor is appointed
and qualified.
(f)  The commission shall annually select one member to serve as chair of the
commission.
(5) (a)  The commission shall meet:
(i)  at least quarterly on a regular date to be fixed by the commission; and
(ii)  at such other times at the call of:
(A)  the director; or
(B)  any two members of the commission.
(b)  A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(c)  An action of the commission requires a vote of a majority of members
present.
(6)  A member of the commission shall, by sworn and written statement filed
with the Department of Commerce and the lieutenant governor, disclose any
position of employment or ownership interest that the member has with respect
to an entity or business subject to the jurisdiction of the division or
commission.  This statement shall be filed upon appointment and must be
appropriately amended whenever significant changes occur in matters covered by
the statement.
(7)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(8) (a)  A rule or form made by the division under this section that is in
effect on May 11, 2009, is considered to have been concurred with by the
commission as of May 12, 2009, until the commission acts on the rule or form.
(b)  For a civil or administrative action pending under this chapter as of May
12, 2009, brought under the authority of division under this chapter as in
effect May 11, 2009 that may be brought only by the commission under this
chapter as in effect on May 12, 2009:
(i)  the action shall be considered brought by the commission; and
(ii)  the commission may take any act authorized under this chapter regarding
that action.
